Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20182-1083
Nursery stock,
defined.

Nursery stock shall mean all botanically classified hardy perennial
or biennial plants, trees, shrubs, and vines, either domesticated or wild,
cuttings, grafts, scions, buds, bulbs, rhizomes, or roots thereof, and such
plants and plant parts for, or capable of, propagation, excluding plants grown
for indoor use, annual plants, florist stock, cut flowers, sod, turf, onions,
potatoes, or seeds of any such plant.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 12;

Laws 2013, LB68, § 6.